Missouri, session 2026, HB2739.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 160, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 160.097, to read as follows:
160.097. No school district or charter school shall be a member of or provide
2 dues to any statewide activities association that provides oversight for athletic or activity
3 eligibility for students and school districts if such association allows post-season or
4 tournament-style athletic competition between public schools and private schools.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.